Utah statutes.
62A-7-404.   Commitment -- Termination and review.

(1)  A youth offender who has been committed to a secure facility shall remain until the offender reaches the age of 21, is paroled, or is discharged.

(2)  A youth offender who has been committed to a secure facility shall appear before the authority within 90 days after commitment, for review of treatment plans and establishment of parole release guidelines.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 13, 2005 General Session

